Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 4. Haines State Forest Resource Management Area.

Sec. 41.15.300.
Haines State Forest Resource Management Area.

The purpose of AS

41.15.300

—

41.15.330

is to establish the land and water presently owned by the state and all land and water acquired in the future by the state lying within the boundaries described in AS

41.15.305(a)

as the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area. The primary purposes for the establishment of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area are the utilization, perpetuation, conservation, and production of the land and water including but not limited to the use of renewable and nonrenewable resources through multiple-use management and the continuation of other beneficial uses including traditional uses and other recreational activities.

The responsibility for the management, control, development, and maintenance of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area established under AS

41.15.300

—

41.15.330

is assigned to the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.15.500. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.15.305.
Establishment and boundaries.

Subject to valid existing rights, the land and water presently owned by the state and all land and water acquired in the future by the state lying within the following described parcels are designated as the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area:

all land encompassed by U.S. Survey 3708, Tracts A, B and C but excluding U.S.M.S. 2206;

that mental health land (MH-153) approved in the state selection letter from the United States Bureau of Land Management dated August 26, 1974, described as follows: Beginning at corner No. 1 of this tract which is common to angle point No. 5 of U.S. Survey 3708, then north 02°13´51" west 52.639 chains along the survey line to corner No. 2 of this tract which is common to angle point No. 6 of U.S. Survey 3708, then north 12°01´18" west 13.346 chains to corner No. 3 of this tract which is common to angle point No. 7 of U.S. Survey 3708, then north 53°57´42" west 537.070 chains to corner No. 4 of this tract which is common to angle point No. 7-A of U.S. Survey 3708, then south 0°0´30" east 63.06 chains to corner No. 5 of this tract, then south 53°57´42" east 542.00 chains to corner No. 1 of this tract and angle point No. 5, U.S. Survey 3708, the point of beginning;

Township 28 South, Range 56 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 28 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 28 South, Range 58 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 29 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 29 South, Range 58 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 29 South, Range 59 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 29 South, Range 60 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 29 South, Range 61 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 29 South, Range 62 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 30 South, Range 57 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 30 South, Range 58 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 30 South, Range 59 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 30 South, Range 60 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 30 South, Range 61 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 30 South, Range 62 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 31 South, Range 58 East, Copper River Meridian;

Township 31 South, Range 59 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 31 South, Range 60 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 31 South, Range 61 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 31 South, Range 62 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 32 South, Range 59 East, Copper River Meridian

Private land, University of Alaska grant land, existing transportation corridors, and borough selections within the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area are excluded from the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area. The commissioner may not acquire private land or University of Alaska grant land located within the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area by eminent domain for any purpose.

Approved or pending Native allotment applications located partially or completely within the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area are not adversely affected by the establishment of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area and all approved allotments and all pending allotments shall be treated as private land.

Section 29: that portion of the N1/2 lying east of U.S.S. 3708

Section 34: NW1/4, SE1/4;

Section 36: that portion of Lots 1, 5, 6, and 10 lying east of U.S.S. 3708;

Sections 19 — 36;

Sections 19 — 36;

Sections 19 and 20

Sections 29 — 32;

Section 1: that portion of Lot 1 lying east of U.S.S. 3708;

That portion lying east and south of U.S.S. 3708;

Sections 1 — 10

Section 12

Sections 14 — 23

Section 27: that portion lying west of the Haines Corporation boundary

Sections 28 — 31

Section 33;

Sections 5 — 8

Sections 17 — 20

Sections 29 — 32;

Sections 6 — 8

Sections 16 — 22

Sections 27 — 34;

Sections 1 — 4

Sections 9 — 15

Sections 22 — 24

Sections 35 and 36;

Sections 1 — 30;

Sections 5 — 8

Sections 17 — 20

Sections 31 and 32;

Sections 3 — 33

Sections 34 — 36: that portion lying north of the Tongass National Forest boundary.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.15.510(a)-(c). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.15.310.
Coordinated management.

The division of forestry shall consult with the division of parks, the Department of Fish and Game, including each local fish and game advisory committee with jurisdiction in the area, and the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve Advisory Council to promote effective, efficient, and coordinated administration of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area and the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve for the values for which each is established.

Resource studies undertaken by the department shall be designed to benefit the management and administration of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area and the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.15.510(d), (e). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.15.315.
Multiple-use management.

The Haines State Forest Resource Management Area shall be managed under the principles of multiple use and sustained yield and under AS 41.17.

The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the management of fish and game resources in the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area under applicable law and in a manner consistent with AS

41.15.300

—

41.15.330

except that an opportunity for continued traditional use of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area at levels and by traditional methods and means is guaranteed. The traditionally compatible uses include but are not limited to fishing, hunting, trapping, berry picking, subsistence, and recreational uses, operation of motorized vehicles, and the harvest of personal-use firewood.

The control of highway access within the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area is the responsibility of the department except that the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities is responsible for the repair and maintenance of public roads in the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area.

The state land and water described in AS

41.15.305(a)

are closed to sale under state land disposal laws. The commissioner may lease the land described in AS

41.15.305(a)

under AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

for a purpose consistent with AS

41.15.300(a)

and a municipality may select land in the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area under law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 153 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.15.520(a), (d)-(f).
Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.15.320.
Management plan and regulations.

In adopting a forest management plan for the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area under AS

41.17.230

, the department shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game and the governing bodies of each municipality in the general area. The Department of Fish and Game shall consult with the department and local fish and game advisory committees, if any, before adopting regulations governing fish and wildlife management in the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area. Regulations may not be adopted by either department without prior review at a public hearing in Haines and Klukwan.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1982; am § 9 ch 153 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.15.520(b), (c), (g).
Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For preparation of initial management plan, see § 4, ch. 95, SLA 1982, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 41.15.325.
Cooperative management agreements.

The department may enter into cooperative management agreements with a person who holds title to or has a valid entry on land within or adjoining the boundaries of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.15.520(h). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.15.330.
Existing rights.

The establishment of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area does not affect the terms and conditions of an existing permit or contract involving use of the land, water, or other resources of the Haines State Forest Resource Management Area.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.15.510(f). Renumbered in 1983.